Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1643SS (1) 91 cm/jh S.F. 53 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 537A.7 Litigation financing 1 contracts ââ void. 2 A litigation financing contract that is a nonrecourse 3 transaction in which financing is provided to a consumer, 4 attorney, or law firm in return for the consumer, attorney, 5 or law firm assigning a contingent right to receive an amount 6 of the potential proceeds of the consumerâs judgment award, 7 settlement, or verdict obtained with respect to the consumerâs 8 legal claim is void, unlawful, and unenforceable. This 9 section does not prohibit the provision of legal services on 10 a contingency fee basis, or the advancement of legal costs, 11 where such services or costs are provided for or on behalf of 12 a consumer by an attorney representing the consumer in the 13 dispute and in accordance with Iowa rules of professional 14 conduct, a commercial tort claim as defined in section 15 554.9102, or a claim under chapter 87. 16 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 17 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 18 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to litigation 19 financing contracts entered into on or after the effective date 20 of this Act. 21